Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.365

Electric vehicle incentive account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The electric vehicle incentive account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for programs and incentives that promote the purchase or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and environmental justice goals under 70A.02 RCW, including but not limited to:

(1) Income-qualified grant programs to retire vehicles and replace them with alternative fuel vehicles;

(2) Programs to provide grants for the installation of electric vehicle infrastructure to support electric vehicle adoption; and

(3) Programs to conduct research and public outreach regarding adoption of alternative fuel vehicles.

[ 2023 c 435 s 8. Prior: 2022 c 297 s 948.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.